Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB63.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3801 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 3801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Medical marijuana." Marijuana used lawfully in accordance with the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act.* * *Section 2. Sections 3802(d)(1) and (2) and 3810 of Title 75 12345678910111213141516171819 are amended to read:§ 3802. Driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance.* * *(d) Controlled substances.--An individual may not drive, operate or be in actual physical control of the movement of a vehicle under any of the following circumstances:(1) There is in the individual's blood any amount of a:(i) Schedule I controlled substance, as defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act. Except for an individual holding a commercial driver's license as defined in section 1603 (relating to definitions), this subparagraph shall not apply to medical marijuana;(ii) Schedule II or Schedule III controlled substance, as defined in The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, which has not been medically prescribed for the individual; or(iii) metabolite of a substance under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(2) The individual is under the influence of a drug, including medical marijuana, or combination of drugs which includes medical marijuana to a degree which impairs the individual's ability to safely drive, operate or be in actual physical control of the movement of the vehicle. The following apply:(i) Possession of a medical marijuana patient identification card shall not, in and of itself, establish reasonable grounds to request a chemical test 20250SB0063PN0024 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 1547 (relating to chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance).(ii) Possession of a medical marijuana patient identification card shall not, in and of itself, be sufficient to establish probable cause to charge the individual with a violation of this section.* * *§ 3810. Authorized use not a defense.The fact that a person charged with violating this chapter is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol [or], controlled substances or medical marijuana is not a defense to a charge of violating this chapter.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0063PN0024 - 3 - 12345678910111213